Massachusetts, session 194th, H3949.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 9A of chapter 150E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(c) Whenever a public employee or public employees engaged in a strike are public
school employees, the school district that employs the public employee or public employees
shall: (i) not reduce or eliminate the hours established by the school district’s school year
schedule pursuant to 603 CMR 27.03; and (ii) maintain structured learning time requirements
pursuant to 603 CMR 27.04.
of 1